Utah statutes.
78B-14-301 (Superseded 07/01/15).   Proceedings under chapter.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this part applies to all proceedings under this chapter.

(2)  An individual petitioner or a support-enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

